District of Columbia statutes.
5-337.01

Police identifying information.

Every member of the Metropolitan Police Department (“MPD”), while in uniform, shall wear or display the nameplate and badge issued by the MPD, or the equivalent identification issued by the MPD, and shall not alter or cover the identifying information or otherwise prevent or hinder a member of the public from reading the information.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-352, § 321, 52 DCR 2296